District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.18

Repealed

Revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 19, 45 DCR 3747
Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-162, § 2, 53 DCR 5397
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.18.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of NCRC and AWC Debt Acquisition Delegation Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-405, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5417).